New Jersey, session 221, S2881.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A 1[county vocational]1 school district with an automotive program may enter into a partnership with one or more private entities to develop and establish an electric vehicle certification program.  Under the program, the 1[county vocational]1 school district shall identify needed skills, develop training programs, and train students for careers in one or more electric vehicle-related fields including, but not limited to, automotive technology, engineering and design, and maintenance and repair.  The 1[county vocational]1 school district shall issue an electric vehicle certification to each person who successfully completes the training program. b.    A 1[county vocational]1 school district may review national standards established by various industries in developing an electric vehicle certification program. c.     A 1[county vocational]1 school district may consult with the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities in developing an electric vehicle certification program. 1d. As used in this section, school district means any local or regional school district established pursuant to chapter 8 or chapter 13 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes and any jointure commission, county vocational school district, county special services district, educational services commission, educational research and demonstration center, environmental education center, and educational information and resource center.1 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.